Hawaii statutes.
§501-262 Effect of deregistration. (a)
From and after the date and time of deregistration of registered land:

(1) The deregistered land shall no longer be
registered land for purposes of this chapter;

(2) No instruments, documents, or papers relating
solely to deregistered land shall be filed or recorded with the assistant
registrar pursuant to this chapter, but shall instead be recorded in the bureau
of conveyances pursuant to chapter 502; and

(3) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
chapter, chapter 502 shall apply to the deregistered land.

(b) Neither voluntary deregistration of land
other than a fee time share interest nor the mandatory deregistration of any
fee time share interest pursuant to part II of this chapter, whether by recordation
of a certificate of title in the bureau of conveyances prior to July 1,
2012, or by operation of law thereafter, shall disturb the effect of any
proceedings in the land court where the question of title has been determined.
All proceedings had in connection with the registration of title that relate to
the settlement or determination of title to deregistered land before the date
and time of deregistration, and all provisions of this chapter that relate to
the status of the title, shall have continuing force and effect with respect to
the period of time that title remained under the land court system. An
uncertified fee time share interest certificate of title shall have the same
force and effect as a certified fee time share interest certificate of title;
provided that the assistant registrar shall have the right to correct and
complete the uncertified fee time share interest certificate of title prior to
certification thereof; provided further that upon certification thereof,
section 501-261(2) shall apply. Those provisions giving rise to a right of
action for compensation from the State, including any limits on and conditions
to the recovery of compensation and the State's rights of subrogation with
respect thereto, shall also continue in force and effect with respect to the
period of time that title remained under the land court system. [L 2009, c 120,
pt of §2, §21; am L 2012, c 121, §5; am L 2013, c 119, §§7, 11; am L 2016, c
215, §4]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next